New York, session 2025-2026, A6937.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1367-a of the racing, pari-mutuel wagering and 2 breeding law is amended by adding a new subdivision 8 to read as 3 follows: 4 8. (a) All withdrawal transactions made through a service provided by 5 a mobile sports wagering licensee shall be irreversible by the withdraw- 6 ing consumer, the mobile sports wagering licensee or another at the 7 consumer's request. 8 (b) Any mobile sports wagering licensee which violates the provisions 9 of this subdivision shall incur a civil penalty of ten thousand dollars 10 per day such withdrawals are permitted to be withdrawn. Where the 11 commission determines that a mobile sports wagering licensee has engaged 12 in a persistent course of conduct in violation of this subdivision, such 13 mobile sports wagering licensee shall incur a civil penalty not to 14 exceed twenty-five thousand dollars per day such withdrawals are permit- 15 ted to be withdrawn. 16 (c) Any provision in a contract between a person and an entity which 17 eliminates or augments a person's rights with respect to the provisions 18 of this subdivision shall be void. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 20 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10860-03-5